Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1107.03
Director of Administrative Services; records; copies; fee; maintenance.

All accounts, vouchers, and documents settled or to be settled by the Director of Administrative Services shall be of record in his or her office and copies thereof, authenticated by his or her official seal, shall be furnished to any person interested therein who shall require the same, upon the payment to the director of an amount established by the director, not to exceed actual costs for every copy. Such records may be maintained in any acceptable photographic form in lieu of the original record pursuant to section 25-1281 when authorization is given by the State Records Administrator.

R.S.1866, c. 4, § 8, p. 23;

R.S.1913, § 5550;

C.S.1922;

§ 4852;

C.S.1929, § 84-308;

Laws 1941, c. 190, § 1, p. 759;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 84-308;

R.S.1943, § 84-308;

Laws 1955, c. 348, § 1, p. 1067;

Laws 1973, LB 224, § 13;

Laws 1984, LB 933, § 18;

R.S.Supp.,1986, § 84-308.